RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/da_DK.dic
Haldor/Am
Mauri/ADm
Odile/Am
Oli/AJm
affodring/AFHm
afnøde/CWcm
afsoner/AFJQm
akvarium/AIm
alkoholambulatorium/AIm
ambition/AFHm
ambulatorium/AIm
amfibium/AIm
amtstue/AGMWm
anis/GLm
anløbe/ACDJWcfm
anmeldelsesordning/AFHm
antistof/AEMm
anvendelig/szm
argumentere/ACWXcdfm
arkipelag/ABHm
auktioner/AJQm
bagagebærer/AFJQm
bagslag/ABKm
bakkekam/AGLRm
barbere/ACGMWbcm
barrikader/AJQm
befærdet/zm
beluring/AFHm
beskyttet/zm
beslutte/ACMWXZbfm
betrække/ACDJWZbm
bidselspænde/ACDMWm
bildæk/AELm
biled/ABEKQm
bison/AFHm
bistandssekretariat/ABHm
blandingen/uvm
bobine/ACDGMWm
boreplatform/AFKQm
bramstænger/AJm
bredder/AJym
brudgom/AGLRm
brudte/bcwm
brugelig/szm
brugt/suyzm
bryg/AELm
brystbillede/ACDMWm
brændværdi/AFHm
brødstudium/AIm
bugtaler/AFJQm
bundgarnspæl/AFKQm
bure/ACDJWcm
buste/AGMWbm
bygning/AFHuvxm
bægerglas/ELm
bælt/ABHQm
columbusæg/AEm
cylinderhat/AGLRm
damp/AFHKQkm
dampet/vwym
dekanesse/AGMWm
deklination/AFHm
delen/AQrym
delt/uvxyzm
deltidsarbejder/AFJQm
detailprojektere/CWcm
detailstudium/Im
dommedag/AFKQm
domæne/ACDMWm
dovendyr/ABKm
drejede/bym
drift/AFHtm
driftens/tum
drives/stuvwym
dryppende/wm
dualisme/AGMWbm
dumpningstal/AELm
dybstruktur/AFHm
efterret/Gm
elektronspil/AELm
elevere/CWcm
elitehold/ABKm
epos/Lm
erkende/AWacerm
etablering/AFHsm
evangelium/AIm
faconstål/ABKm
falde/ACDJWcem
faldne/bvym
falkoner/AFHm
famlende/tm
farbar/zm
fattelig/uzm
favne/ACGJWcm
filkopiering/AFHm
fjerbold/AFKQm
flerfamilieshus/BKQm
fluoridere/CWcm
fokkefald/ABKm
folketingsmedlem/AEMm
fordrer/tuxm
fordret/tuxm
fordringer/AJrtuxm
forening/AFHsm
forholdsordre/AGMWbm
forkant/AFHm
forstærkning/AFHym
forsøge/ACDJWcehm
fortone/ACWZcm
forudselig/zm
fremsættelsen/sm
fries/tvm
fundet/stuvwm
fyrede/bwm
fængselsstraffe/AGJbm
færdselsdrab/ABKm
fødehjem/AELm
føj/tvym
gangene/Abcuvwxm
garderregiment/ABHm
generator/AFHm
genforhandle/Am
genopleve/CWcm
gevær/ABHm
giv/HQkrm
giveren/rsxm
givet/rstuvwxym
gratis/CDm
grænsende/twm
grøder/AJwm
gymnasium/AIm
gående/ruvwxm
går/rtvwym
gård/AFKQym
halet/vxym
hankøn/Em
hensigtsmæssig/Czm
hjord/AFHKQm
holdet/Auvym
homoseksuel/CRm
hovedgruppe/AGMWm
huggede/bvwxm
hvile/ACDGJWcm
hyttefad/ABKQm
håringen/Atwm
hæftelse/AGMWtm
højesteretsdom/AGLMRm
individualist/AFHm
indsatte/Absm
indstiller/ym
industriministerium/AIm
isenkræmmer/AFJQm
isætte/AZm
jord/AFHQm
juleøl/AEMm
kaldet/uwzm
kasserende/vm
kendt/stzm
klag/FHQkrm
klassesamfund/ABKm
klogskab/yzm
klynkehoved/ABHm
klæbemærke/ACDMWm
klæg/BFHQm
klække/Zxm
knapning/AFHwm
kolportere/CWcm
kommende/rstvm
konventualinde/AGMWm
kraftudtryk/Em
kranium/Im
krævet/uvwxm
kulturministerium/AIm
kvadrattal/AELm
kvinde/AGMWym
ladede/buvwm
ladt/uvwym
lagring/AFHum
lampe/ACDGMWbm
landene/Abuxzm
lavede/btm
lediggænger/AFJQm
leopard/AFHm
luftfartøj/ABHm
lygtemænd/AKm
låsninger/AJwm
læring/tuvm
lært/tuvxm
læsning/AFHsum
løbende/rtvm
løftede/bym
løses/uvwxym
løst/suvwxyzm
magten/Awm
maling/AFHtxm
manipuleret/sm
melbær/AEMOm
meldt/rtvwm
metrum/Im
miljømærke/ACDMWm
momentum/Im
monografi/AFHm
monoteisme/Gm
murerarbejde/ACDMWm
målt/wxm
mønstring/AFHwxm
naglende/ym
nationalmuseum/AIm
nippedrik/AGLRm
nordbo/AFHm
nådestød/ABKm
nødig/Czm
oldemødre/AJm
oliemaling/AFHm
ombud/ABKm
opførte/bcsm
opstå/Wsm
optrykning/sm
pejlkompas/EMm
plausibel/Cm
plejet/zm
prust/ABKQm
præget/vxm
prøvede/bwm
randsyning/AFHm
rebstige/AGMWm
registrering/AFHvm
regn/tuvwxym
regnede/btuwxm
regningsart/AFHm
rekognosceringsfly/ABKm
relativitetsteori/AFHm
retning/AFHrtuvwxym
rigtig/tuzm
ringningen/Auwxm
rulning/AFHuxm
rumdeler/AFJQm
rustningen/Auwxm
ryg/AHLkm
råmateriale/ACDMWm
sammenføjningssted/ABHm
score/CWm
selvvalg/ABCKm
sendes/uvwxm
ser/rstvwm
set/rtvwxzm
sigter/AJrvxm
situationsspil/AELm
skifter/AFJQxm
skinke/AGMWbm
skinnerømmer/AFJQm
skjulested/ABHm
skreven/rtvwyzm
skriften/Auvwxym
skriveredskab/ABHm
skulder/AFJORm
skydning/AFHrtvwxym
slaget/Artuvwxym
slutningen/Atuwm
smuglende/vxm
snit/AEGLMRm
sommerfuglenet/AELm
spatium/ABHIm
spekuleret/xm
spiseæble/ACDMWm
spotlight/ABKm
springet/Auxym
standens/rstuwym
starterne/Absum
stedsbestemmelse/AGMWm
stemme/ACDGMWZbm
stemt/tuwyzm
stillende/tm
stivede/bwm
stol/ACFGKMQRm
stole/ACGJWcem
strakte/cxym
stribe/ACGMWYcm
studerede/bvm
støvende/tuym
støvet/tuym
substantiv/ABHm
svarlig/rym
synkromesh/AFHm
synlig/yzm
tagryg/ALm
tales/tvwxym
talte/bctvwm
tegninger/AJruvwym
teknologisk/sm
telefonnet/AELm
tilkald/ABCKQm
tilkalde/ACDJWacem
tilstandskontrol/AGMm
tipper/AFJQm
tom/CDGMRm
topersonersvogn/AFKQm
traf/rvm
trit/rm
troværdige/czm
tydning/AFHrtxm
tællende/ym
uddanne/Cam
ugeblad/ABKQm
underskrift/AFHm
vandt/sym
varmeleder/AFJQm
varsling/AFHvwm
vasker/uwxym
vederheftig/zm
vid/CEGJMQXm
vinhandler/AFJQm
virker/tvxm
vuggegave/AGMWm
vægtløfter/AFJQm
værtsland/ABKQm
åd/xym
åndsarbejde/ACDMWm
ædt/vym
æstetisk/rzm
øvende/uvxm
